Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licensing and Specialty Certifications

§ 1181.
Repealed. 2013, No. 27, § 16.

§ 1181a.
Engineer interns.

An engineer intern certification shall be issued by the Board to recognize those persons who have completed preliminary steps toward becoming licensed as a professional engineer. Engineer interns are not authorized to practice professional engineering.

The minimum qualifications for certification by the Board as an engineer intern are as follows:

a bachelor’s degree in engineering or in engineering technology or six years or more of progressive engineering experience of a grade and character acceptable to the Board; and

a passing score set by Board rule on a fundamentals of engineering examination recognized by Board rule and taken in the State of Vermont.

Upon satisfaction of the minimum qualifications set forth in subsection (b) of this section, the Board shall issue a certificate as an engineer intern. The certificate shall have no expiration date and no renewal fees.

The use of the titles “Engineer Intern” and “E.I.” in Vermont is restricted to those persons certified as engineer interns by the Board or by an equivalent board in another state. An engineer intern certified by an equivalent board in another state shall be recognized as an engineer intern by the Board without further application or examination.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 27

, § 10.

§ 1182.
Repealed. 2013, No. 27, § 16.

§ 1182a.
Licensing standards.

Licensing standards and procedures adopted or used by the Board shall be fair and reasonable. The standards and procedures shall be designed and implemented to ensure that all qualified applicants are admitted to practice unless there is good reason to believe that practice by a particular applicant would be inconsistent with the public health, safety, and welfare. Licensing standards shall not be designed or implemented for the purpose of limiting the number of licensees.

The Board recognizes the following routes to licensure:

Individuals with a bachelor’s degree in engineering. A professional engineering license shall be issued to a person who:

satisfactorily completes a bachelor’s level engineering curriculum accredited by the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology (ABET);

attains a passing score set by Board rule on a fundamentals of engineering examination recognized by Board rule;

completes four years or more of progressive engineering experience after graduation of a grade and character that indicate to the Board that the applicant may be competent to practice engineering, at least two years of which shall be in the specialty discipline for which the license is sought. A master’s degree in engineering may be counted as one year of experience;

attains a passing score on a specialized examination recognized by Board rule testing the principles and practices of engineering in the specialty discipline sought; and

satisfies all requirements set forth in the Board’s rules.

Individuals with a master’s degree in engineering. A professional engineering license shall be issued to a person who:

satisfactorily completes a bachelor’s level curriculum in a technical field related to engineering and master’s level engineering curriculum accredited by ABET;

attains a passing score on a fundamentals of engineering examination recognized by Board rule;

completes four years or more of progressive engineering experience after graduation from the master’s degree program of a grade and character that indicate to the Board that the applicant may be competent to practice engineering, at least two years of which shall be in the specialty discipline for which the license is sought;

attains a passing score on a specialized examination recognized by Board rule testing the principles and practices of engineering in the specialty discipline sought; and

satisfies all requirements set forth in the Board’s rules.

Individuals with a bachelor’s degree in engineering technology. A professional engineering license shall be issued to a person who:

satisfactorily completes a bachelor’s level engineering technology curriculum accredited by ABET;

attains a passing score on a fundamentals of engineering examination recognized by Board rule;

completes eight years or more of progressive engineering experience after graduation of a grade and character that indicate to the Board that the applicant may be competent to practice engineering, at least four years of which shall be in the specialty discipline for which the license is sought;

attains a passing score on a specialized examination recognized by Board rule testing the principles and practices of engineering in the specialty discipline sought; and

satisfies all requirements set forth in the Board’s rules.

Twelve years of engineering experience. A professional engineering license shall be issued to a person who:

attains a passing score on a fundamentals of engineering examination recognized by Board rule;

completes 12 years or more of progressive engineering experience of a grade and character that indicate to the Board that the applicant may be competent to practice engineering, at least six years of which shall be in the specialty discipline for which the license is sought;

attains a passing score on a specialized examination recognized by Board rule testing the principles and practices of engineering in the specialty discipline sought; and

satisfies all requirements set forth in the Board’s rules.

Sixteen years of engineering experience. A professional engineering license shall be issued to a person who:

completes 16 years or more of progressive engineering experience of a grade and character that indicate to the Board that the applicant may be competent to practice engineering, at least eight years of which shall be in the specialty discipline for which the license is sought;

attains a passing score on a specialized examination recognized by Board rule testing the principles and practices of engineering in the specialty discipline sought; and

satisfies all requirements set forth in the Board’s rules.

Alternate route to licensure. A professional engineering license may be issued to a person who:

attains a passing score on a fundamentals of engineering examination recognized by Board rule;

completes education and experience that, in the judgment of the Board, demonstrates a substantially equivalent level of preparation for engineering practice as required by subdivision (b)(1), (b)(2), or (b)(3) of this section;

attains a passing score on a specialized examination recognized by Board rule testing the principles and practices of engineering in the specialty discipline sought; and

satisfies all requirements set forth in the Board’s rules.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 27

, § 11.

§ 1182b.
License and specialty disciplines.

Upon determining that an applicant is qualified for licensure in one or more specialty disciplines under section 1182a of this subchapter, the Board shall issue a license indicating the specialty discipline or disciplines.

Upon determining that an existing licensee is qualified by application in an additional specialty discipline under section 1182a of this subchapter, the Board shall issue a license to the licensee indicating all specialty disciplines.

Licenses issued under this chapter shall be renewed biennially.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 27

, § 12.

§ 1183.
License renewal.

Licenses shall be renewed every two years without examination and on payment of the required fees. However, by rule, the Board may establish a continuing education requirement. If the Board establishes a continuing education requirement and a licensee fails to demonstrate compliance with that requirement, it may deny or condition renewal, after opportunity for hearing.

Following expiration of a license, it may be reinstated upon payment of a renewal fee and a late renewal penalty. A licensee shall not be required to pay renewal fees during periods when the license was expired.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2013, No. 27

, § 13.

§§ 1184-1186.
Repealed. 2013, No. 27, § 16.

§ 1187.
Repealed. 2009, No. 103 (Adj. Sess.), § 53.

§ 1188.
Seal.

Each licensee shall obtain a seal of a design approved by the Board by rule.

Plans, specifications, reports, and other instruments of service issued by a licensee shall be signed and sealed by the licensee.

A person who affixes to a plan or other document the seal of a licensee without the licensee’s authorization shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 or imprisoned not more than 30 days, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2013, No. 27

, § 14.